Washington statutes.
RCW 11.80.020

Inventory and appraisement—Bond of trustee.

The trustee so appointed shall make, subscribe and file in the office of the clerk of the court an oath for the faithful performance of his or her duties, and shall, within such time as may be fixed by the judge, prepare and file an inventory of such property, and the judge shall thereupon appoint a disinterested and qualified person to appraise such property, and report his or her appraisement to the court within such time as the court may fix. Upon the coming in of the inventory and appraisement, the judge shall fix the amount of the bond to be given by the trustee, which bond shall in no case be less than the appraised value of the personal property and the annual rents and profits of the real property, and the trustee shall thereupon file with the clerk of the court a good and sufficient bond in the amount fixed and with surety to be approved by the court, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties as trustee, and for accounting for such property, its rents, issues, profits, and increase.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2078; 1967 c 168 s 15; 1965 c 145 s 11.80.020. Prior: 1915 c 39 s 2; RRS s 1715-2.]